Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.115

Conditions on shares of stock subject to restriction on sale.

In connection with shares of capital stock subject to restriction on sale for a period of time:

(1) Each certificate for the stock shall bear a legend giving appropriate notice of the restriction;

(2) Appropriate instructions shall be issued to the transfer agent for the capital stock with respect to applicable restrictions on transfer of any such restricted stock; and

(3) Any shares issued as a stock dividend, stock split, or otherwise with respect to any such restricted stock shall be subject to the same restrictions as may apply to the restricted stock.

[ 1985 c 56 s 18; 1981 c 85 s 22.]